Utah statutes.
56-1-16.   Time schedules to be maintained -- Notice of delays.
Every railroad company shall start and run its trains for the transportation
of persons and property at such regular times as it shall fix by public
notice, and the station agents thereof shall announce on a bulletin board,
placed in a conspicuous and public place at each station not less than 15
minutes before the regular time of departure of each passenger train, the time
of such departure, or if the train is delayed, the probable duration of such
delay, and on failure to do so is guilty of a misdemeanor. The railroad
company shall be liable for all damages that may be sustained by any person by
reason of the failure of any of its station agents to observe the requirements
of this section.
